SIV.lexc
!This is the FST for Iñapari stative intransitive verbs.      

LEXICON SIV
pu'aníni'a SIVtag ;
potrania SIVtag ;
piture SIVtag ;
panáya'ahea SIVtag ;
nati SIVtag ;
ma SIVtag ;
ina SIVtag ;
iinanima SIVtag ;
amírumára SIVtag ;
itu'a SIVtag ;

LEXICON SIVtag
@U.SIV.YES@ Mood ;
